New York, session 2025-2026, A6317.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 6 of chapter 395 of the laws of 1978, relating to 2 moratoriums on the issuance of certificates of environmental safety for 3 the siting of facilities and certification of routes for the transporta- 4 tion of liquefied natural or petroleum gas, as amended by chapter 150 of 5 the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 6 § 6. This act shall take effect immediately and remain in full force 7 and effect only to and including April 1, 1999 provided, however that 8 the provisions of this act shall remain in full force and effect in 9 cities with a population of one million or more until April 1, [2025] 10 2027. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10323-01-5